California, session 20252026, AB2020.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 50406.4.5 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:50406.4.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, to improve the fiscal integrity of a development financed with departmental resources, the department, in its sole discretion, may authorize the transfer of excess reserves or excess operating income from one rental housing development, subject to a department regulatory agreement, to another rental housing development, subject to a department regulatory agreement, that is owned by the same sponsor or affiliate thereof.(b) For purposes of this section:(1) “Excess operating income” means the annual net operating income in excess of the amount that is 1.15 times the sum total of required annual debt service payments, provided that the owner can demonstrate sufficient net operating income over a 15-year period.(2) “Excess reserves” means replacement reserves, operating reserves, or transition reserves no longer required by, or in excess of the minimum amount required by, the department regulatory agreement.